Connecticut, session 2026, HB05396.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Religious organization affordable housing development" means
a development proposed by a religious institution or jointly proposed
by a religious institution and any other developer that is located on real
property owned by such religious organization where not less than
twenty per cent of the proposed dwelling units are subject to affordable
housing deed restrictions;
(2) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 47a-
1 of the general statutes;
(3) "Religious organization" has the same meaning as provided in
section 49-31k of the general statutes;
(4) "Affordable housing deed restriction" means a deed restriction
contained in an instrument filed on the land records of the municipality
in which the development is located that requires, for not less than forty
years after the initial occupation of the development, that certain
dwelling units in the development be sold or rented at, or below, a cost
in rent or mortgage payments equivalent to not more than thirty per
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5396
cent of the annual income of individuals and families earning sixty per
cent of the median income of the state or the area median income as
determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development, whichever is less; and
(5) "Summary review" has the same meaning as provided in section
8-2r of the general statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of any zoning regulations
adopted pursuant to section 8-2 of the general statutes or any special act,
except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, any proposed
religious organization housing development shall be allowed subject
only to summary review.
(c) Any zoning regulations adopted pursuant to section 8-2 of the
general statutes or any special act may require that a religious
organization housing development have:
(1) A gross density of (A) thirty or fewer dwelling units per acre if
less than twenty-five per cent of the dwelling units in such development
are subject to an affordable housing deed restriction, or (B) fifty or fewer
dwelling units per acre if twenty-five per cent or greater of the dwelling
units in such development are subject to an affordable housing deed
restriction;
(2) A height not greater than the maximum allowable height for a
residential development in the municipality;
(3) Side and rear setbacks of not less than fifteen feet; and
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 8-3n of the general
statutes, off-street motor vehicle parking if the development is greater
than one-half mile from any public transit station, provided such
parking requirements shall not exceed one parking space per dwelling
unit.
(d) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to
any real property:
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5396
(1) Owned by a religious organization for fewer than three years;
(2) Located in a special flood hazard area designated on a flood
insurance rate map published by the National Flood Insurance Program;
(3) Located within a radius of three thousand two hundred feet of any
facility that extracts or refines oil or natural gas;
(4) Lacking adequate access to water or sewerage infrastructure; or
(5) Used as a cemetery.
(e) The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to
any development that would require the demolition of any property
listed in the (1) National Register of Historic Places, or (2) State Register
of Historic Places, provided such demolition may occur for property
listed in said state register if such demolition has been approved, in
writing, by the State Historic Preservation Officer.
(f) The summary review process specified in subsection (b) of this
section shall require that a decision on any application be rendered not
later than ninety days after receipt of such application by the planning
commission, zoning commission or combined planning and zoning
commission, except an applicant may consent to one or more extensions
of not more than an additional ninety days or may withdraw such
application.
(g) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to make any
portion of real property used for a religious organization affordable
housing development exempt from taxation pursuant to section 12-81
of the general statutes unless such development meets the requirements
of said section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5396
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subdiv. (c)(1), "if twenty per cent" was changed to "if less than twenty-
five per cent", for accuracy.
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4